incubator/apertium-fo-is.fo.dix
<dictionary>
  <!-- Contains foreign letters which appear in loanwords (W, Z, C, Q, X) -->
  <alphabet>AÁBDÐEFGHIÍJKLMNOÓPRSTUÚVYÝÆØWZCQXaábdðefghiíjklmnoóprstuúvyýæøwzcqx</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"     c="Proper name"/>
    <sdef n="m"      c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"      c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"     c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="acc"    c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="nom"    c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="dat"    c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"    c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="def"    c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ind"    c="Indefinite"/>

    <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pos"    c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="dem"    c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ref"    c="Reflexive"/>

    <sdef n="vblex"  c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"  c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="inf"    c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pp"     c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="past"   c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pres"   c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="p1"     c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="adj"    c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv"    c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="itg"    c="Interrogative"/>

    <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinate conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Sub-ordinate conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Adverbial conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="ij"     c="Interjection"/>

    <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/>

    <sdef n="num"    c="Numeral"/>

    <sdef n="sent"   c="End of sentence marker"/>

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="skál__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="við__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="og__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sum__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ikki__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hví__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ei/n__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tt</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tt</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nari</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nir</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/eg__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eg</l>
          <r>eg<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ær</l>
          <r>eg<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ín</l>
          <r>eg<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="til"><i>til</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="um"><i>um</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="frá"><i>frá</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="eftir"><i>eftir</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="millum"><i>millum</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="yvir"><i>yvir</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="íkring"><i>íkring</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="móti"><i>móti</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aftan"><i>aftan</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ábeint"><i>ábeint</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="foruttan"><i>foruttan</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="hóast"><i>hóast</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ígjørgnum"><i>ígjørgnum</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="oman"><i>oman</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="umframt"><i>umframt</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="báðumegin"><i>báðumegin</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="hesumegin"><i>hesumegin</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skeivumegin"><i>skeivumegin</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aftrat"><i>aftrat</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mótvegis"><i>mótvegis</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sambært"><i>sambært</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="uttan"><i>uttan</i><par n="við__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="og"><i>og</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="enn"><i>enn</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ella"><i>ella</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="men"><i>men</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="tí"><i>tí</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bæði"><i>bæði</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="hvørki"><i>hvørki</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="annaðhvørt"><i>annaðhvørt</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="meðan"><i>meðan</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="sum"><i>sum</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="meðan"><i>meðan</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="vissi"><i>vissi</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="um"><i>um</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="so"><i>so</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="hóast"><i>hóast</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="síðan"><i>síðan</i><par n="sum__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ein"><i>ei</i><par n="ei/n__det"/></e>
    <e lm="seg"><i>s</i><par n="s/eg__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="hví"><i>hví</i><par n="hví__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hvussu"><i>hvussu</i><par n="hví__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hvar"><i>hvar</i><par n="hví__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nær"><i>nær</i><par n="hví__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hvaðan"><i>hvaðan</i><par n="hví__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="uttan"><i>uttan</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="áðrenn"><i>áðrenn</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ikki"><i>ikki</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="inn"><i>inn</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aldri"><i>aldri</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="altíð"><i>altíð</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aftur"><i>aftur</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bara"><i>bara</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bert"><i>bert</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="burt"><i>burt</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="burtur"><i>burtur</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ei"><i>ei</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="enn"><i>enn</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="niður"><i>niður</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="skjótt"><i>skjótt</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="so"><i>so</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="svo"><i>svo</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tá"><i>tá</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tó"><i>tó</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nú"><i>nú</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="úr"><i>úr</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="her"><i>her</i><par n="ikki__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="áh"><i>áh</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ája"><i>ája</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="áje"><i>áje</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ájú"><i>ájú</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ass"><i>ass</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="buldó"><i>buldó</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="bums"><i>bums</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dekan"><i>dekan</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="eya"><i>eya</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="eyeya"><i>eyeya</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="fý"><i>fý</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="há"><i>há</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hó"><i>hó</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hygga"><i>hygga</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="illanstíð"><i>illanstíð</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="íss"><i>íss</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="menn"><i>menn</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="sí"><i>sí</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="takk"><i>takk</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="trumm"><i>trumm</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="tralalei"><i>tralalei</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="uff"><i>uff</i><par n="skál__ij"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/> <!-- Numbers -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/> <!-- End of sentence -->
    </e>
